Nevada, session 83, SB126.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 125.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
125.150 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 125.155 and
125.165, and unless the action is contrary to a premarital agreement
between the parties which is enforceable pursuant to chapter 123A
of NRS:
1. In granting a divorce, the court:
(a) May award such alimony to either spouse, in a specified
principal sum or as specified periodic payments, as appears just and
equitable;
(b) Shall, to the extent practicable, make an equal disposition of
the community property of the parties, including, without limitation,
any community property transferred into an irrevocable trust
pursuant to NRS 123.125 over which the court acquires jurisdiction
pursuant to NRS 164.010, except that the court may make an
unequal disposition of the community property in such proportions
as it deems just if the court finds a compelling reason to do so and
sets forth in writing the reasons for making the unequal disposition;
and
(c) Shall provide [an] a full explanation, or ensure that [an] a
full explanation has been provided, to the parties of any provision
relating to the disposition of pension or retirement benefits that will
be included in the decree of divorce or any related order.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in granting
a divorce, the court shall dispose of any property held in joint
tenancy in the manner set forth in subsection 1 for the disposition of
community property. If a party has made a contribution of separate
property to the acquisition or improvement of property held in joint
tenancy, the court may provide for the reimbursement of that party
for his or her contribution. The amount of reimbursement must not
exceed the amount of the contribution of separate property that can
be traced to the acquisition or improvement of property held in joint
tenancy, without interest or any adjustment because of an increase in
the value of the property held in joint tenancy. The amount of
reimbursement must not exceed the value, at the time of the
disposition, of the property held in joint tenancy for which the
contribution of separate property was made. In determining whether
-
*SB126*

– 3 –
to provide for the reimbursement, in whole or in part, of a party who
has contributed separate property, the court shall consider:
(a) The intention of the parties in placing the property in joint
tenancy;
(b) The length of the marriage; and
(c) Any other factor which the court deems relevant in making a
just and equitable disposition of that property.
 As used in this subsection, “contribution” includes, without
limitation, a down payment, a payment for the acquisition or
improvement of property, and a payment reducing the principal of a
loan used to finance the purchase or improvement of property. The
term does not include a payment of interest on a loan used to finance
the purchase or improvement of property, or a payment made for
maintenance, insurance or taxes on property.
3. A party may file a postjudgment motion in any action for
divorce, annulment or separate maintenance to obtain adjudication
of any community property or liability omitted from the decree or
judgment as the result of fraud or mistake. A motion pursuant to this
subsection must be filed within 3 years after the discovery by the
aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud or mistake. The
court has continuing jurisdiction to hear such a motion and shall
equally divide the omitted community property or liability between
the parties unless the court finds that:
(a) The community property or liability was included in a prior
equal disposition of the community property of the parties or in an
unequal disposition of the community property of the parties which
was made pursuant to written findings of a compelling reason for
making that unequal disposition; or
(b) The court determines a compelling reason in the interests of
justice to make an unequal disposition of the community property or
liability and sets forth in writing the reasons for making the unequal
disposition.
 If a motion pursuant to this subsection results in a judgment
dividing a defined benefit pension plan, the judgment may not be
enforced against an installment payment made by the plan more
than 6 years after the installment payment.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 125.141, whether or
not application for suit money has been made under the provisions
of NRS 125.040, the court may award a reasonable attorney’s fee to
either party to an action for divorce.
5. In granting a divorce, the court may also set apart such
portion of the separate property of either spouse for the other
spouse’s support or the separate property of either spouse for the
support of their children as is deemed just and equitable.
-
*SB126*

– 4 –
6. In the event of the death of either party or the subsequent
remarriage of the spouse to whom specified periodic payments were
to be made, all the payments required by the decree must cease,
unless it was otherwise ordered by the court.
7. If the court adjudicates the property rights of the parties, or
an agreement by the parties settling their property rights has been
approved by the court, whether or not the court has retained
jurisdiction to modify them, the adjudication of property rights, and
the agreements settling property rights, may nevertheless at any time
thereafter be modified by the court upon written stipulation signed
and acknowledged by the parties to the action, and in accordance
with the terms thereof.
8. If a decree of divorce, or an agreement between the parties
which was ratified, adopted or approved in a decree of divorce,
provides for specified periodic payments of alimony, the decree or
agreement is not subject to modification by the court as to accrued
payments. Payments pursuant to a decree entered on or after July 1,
1975, which have not accrued at the time a motion for modification
is filed may be modified upon a showing of changed circumstances,
whether or not the court has expressly retained jurisdiction for the
modification. In addition to any other factors the court considers
relevant in determining whether to modify the order, the court shall
consider whether the income of the spouse who is ordered to pay
alimony, as indicated on the spouse’s federal income tax return for
the preceding calendar year, has been reduced to such a level that
the spouse is financially unable to pay the amount of alimony the
spouse has been ordered to pay.
9. In addition to any other factors the court considers relevant
in determining whether to award alimony and the amount of such an
award, the court shall consider:
(a) The financial condition of each spouse;
(b) The nature and value of the respective property of each
spouse;
(c) The contribution of each spouse to any property held by the
spouses pursuant to NRS 123.030;
(d) The duration of the marriage;
(e) The income, earning capacity, age and health of each spouse;
(f) The standard of living during the marriage;
(g) The career before the marriage of the spouse who would
receive the alimony;
(h) The existence of specialized education or training or the
level of marketable skills attained by each spouse during the
marriage;
(i) The contribution of either spouse as homemaker;
-
*SB126*

– 5 –
(j) The award of property granted by the court in the divorce,
other than child support and alimony, to the spouse who would
receive the alimony; and
(k) The physical and mental condition of each party as it relates
to the financial condition, health and ability to work of that spouse.
10. In granting a divorce, the court shall consider the need to
grant alimony to a spouse for the purpose of obtaining training or
education relating to a job, career or profession. In addition to any
other factors the court considers relevant in determining whether
such alimony should be granted, the court shall consider:
(a) Whether the spouse who would pay such alimony has
obtained greater job skills or education during the marriage; and
(b) Whether the spouse who would receive such alimony
provided financial support while the other spouse obtained job skills
or education.
11. If the court determines that alimony should be awarded
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 10:
(a) The court, in its order, shall provide for the time within
which the spouse who is the recipient of the alimony must
commence the training or education relating to a job, career or
profession.
(b) The spouse who is ordered to pay the alimony may, upon
changed circumstances, file a motion to modify the order.
(c) The spouse who is the recipient of the alimony may be
granted, in addition to any other alimony granted by the court,
money to provide for:
(1) Testing of the recipient’s skills relating to a job, career or
profession;
(2) Evaluation of the recipient’s abilities and goals relating to
a job, career or profession;
(3) Guidance for the recipient in establishing a specific plan
for training or education relating to a job, career or profession;
(4) Subsidization of an employer’s costs incurred in training
the recipient;
(5) Assisting the recipient to search for a job; or
(6) Payment of the costs of tuition, books and fees for:
(I) The equivalent of a high school diploma;
(II) College courses which are directly applicable to the
recipient’s goals for his or her career; or
(III) Courses of training in skills desirable for
employment.
12. For the purposes of this section, a change of 20 percent or
more in the gross monthly income of a spouse who is ordered to pay
alimony shall be deemed to constitute changed circumstances
requiring a review for modification of the payments of alimony. As
-
*SB126*

– 6 –
used in this subsection, “gross monthly income” means the total
amount of income received each month from any source of a person
who is not self-employed or the gross income from any source of a
self-employed person, after deduction of all legitimate business
expenses, but without deduction for personal income taxes,
contributions for retirement benefits, contributions to a pension or
for any other personal expenses.
Sec. 2. NRS 125.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
125.155 Unless the action is contrary to a premarital agreement
between the parties which is enforceable pursuant to chapter 123A
of NRS or is prohibited by specific statute:
1. In determining the value of an interest in or entitlement to a
pension or retirement benefit provided by the Public Employees’
Retirement System pursuant to chapter 286 of NRS or the Judicial
Retirement Plan established pursuant to NRS 1A.300, the court:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), shall base
its determination upon the amount of the pension or retirement
benefits to which the participating party would have been entitled
using the salary base and years of service of the participating
party on the date on which a decree of legal separation or divorce
is entered.
(b) If the nonparticipating party is a homemaker:
(1) Shall base its determination upon the number of years or
portion thereof that the [contributing] participating party was
employed and received the interest or entitlement, beginning on the
date of the marriage and ending on the date on which a decree of
legal separation or divorce is entered; and
[(b)] (2) Shall not base its determination upon any estimated
increase in the value of the interest or entitlement resulting from a
promotion, raise or any other efforts made by the party who
contributed to the interest or entitlement as a result of his or her
continued employment after the date of a decree of legal separation
or divorce.
2. The court may, in making a disposition of a pension or
retirement benefit provided by the Public Employees’ Retirement
System or the Judicial Retirement Plan, order that the benefit not be
paid before the date on which the participating party retires. To
ensure that the party who is not a participant will receive payment
for the benefits, the court may:
(a) On its own motion or pursuant to an agreement of the
parties, require the participating party to furnish a performance or
surety bond, executed by the participating party as principal and by
a corporation qualified under the laws of this state as surety, made
payable to the party who is not a participant under the plan, and
conditioned upon the payment of the pension or retirement benefits.
-
*SB126*

– 7 –
The bond must be in a principal sum equal to the amount of the
determined interest of the nonparticipating party in the pension or
retirement benefits and must be in a form prescribed by the court.
(b) On its own motion or pursuant to an agreement of the
parties, require the participating party to purchase a policy of life
insurance. The amount payable under the policy must be equal to
the determined interest of the nonparticipating party in the pension
or retirement benefits. The nonparticipating party must be named as
a beneficiary under the policy and must remain a named beneficiary
until the participating party retires.
(c) Pursuant to an agreement of the parties, increase the value of
the determined interest of the nonparticipating party in the pension
or retirement benefit as compensation for the delay in payment of
the benefit to that party.
(d) On its own motion or pursuant to an agreement of the
parties, allow the participating party to provide any other form of
security which ensures the payment of the determined interest of the
nonparticipating party in the pension or retirement benefit.
3. If a party receives an interest in or an entitlement to a
pension or retirement benefit which the party would not otherwise
have an interest in or be entitled to if not for a disposition made
pursuant to this section, the interest or entitlement and any related
obligation to pay that interest or entitlement terminates upon the
death of either party unless pursuant to:
(a) An agreement of the parties; or
(b) An order of the court,
 a party who is a participant in the Public Employees’ Retirement
System or the Judicial Retirement Plan provides an alternative to an
unmodified service retirement allowance pursuant to NRS 1A.450
or 286.590.
Sec. 3. NRS 286.6703 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.6703 1. A person may submit a judgment, decree or
order of a district court, the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court
of the State of Nevada relating to child support, alimony or the
disposition of community property to the Executive Officer or the
designee of the Executive Officer for a determination of whether
the judgment, decree or order entitles an alternate payee to receive
from the System all or a portion of the allowance or benefit of a
member or a retired employee.
2. The judgment, decree or order submitted to the Executive
Officer must be signed by a district judge, the judges of the Court of
Appeals or by the justices of the Supreme Court and entered and
certified by the clerk of the district court or the Clerk of the
Supreme Court. Any order relating to the disposition of community
property that is issued by a district judge, the judges of the Court
-
*SB126*

– 8 –
of Appeals or the justices of the Supreme Court pursuant to a
decree of divorce must be expressly referenced in the authorizing
decree of divorce.
3. The Executive Officer or the designee of the Executive
Officer shall, in accordance with rules prescribed by the Board,
determine whether the judgment, decree or order entitles the
alternate payee to receive an allowance or benefit from the System.
An alternate payee is entitled to receive an allowance or benefit
from the System if the judgment, decree or order:
(a) Specifies clearly the names and last known mailing
addresses, if any, of the member or retired employee and the
alternate payee;
(b) Specifies clearly the amount, percentage or manner of
determining the amount of the allowance or benefit of the member
or retired employee that must be paid by the System to each
alternate payee;
(c) Specifically directs the System to pay an allowance or
benefit to the alternate payee;
(d) Does not require the System to provide an allowance or
benefit or any option not otherwise provided under this chapter; and
(e) Does not require the payment of an allowance or benefit to
an alternate payee before the retirement of a member or the
distribution to or withdrawal of contributions by a member.
4. For purposes of this section, “alternate payee” means a
spouse, former spouse, child or other dependent of a member or
retired employee who, pursuant to a judgment, decree or order
relating to child support, alimony or the disposition of community
property, is entitled to receive all or a portion of the allowance or
benefit of a member or retired member from the System.
H
-
*SB126*